src/fst/morphology/incoming/bla_verb_test.lexc
!PV/iinik+
!PV/iitaisap+
!PV/iitsiksist+
!PV/iitskimaan+
!PV/iiyik+
!PV/ika'+
!PV/ika'to+
!PV/ikaap+
!PV/ikaiksist+
!PV/ikak+
!PV/ikamo't+
!PV/ikapo+
PV/ikátá'+
!PV/ikayiss+
!PV/ikia'ya+
!PV/ikihkiht+
!PV/ikimm+
!PV/ikimmat+
!PV/ikipp+
!PV/ikippa'+
!PV/ikkam+
!PV/ikkan+
!PV/ikkia'+
!PV/ikkihkini+
!PV/ikkina+
!PV/iksissto+
!PV/iksist+
!PV/iksksowa'+
!PV/ikssto+
!PV/ikstsina'+
!PV/ikíppoa+
!PV/imaat+
!PV/imak+
!PV/immoyi+
!PV/inai't+
!PV/inikk+
!PV/innaahkoot+
!PV/ipahkitap+
!PV/ipahtsik+
!PV/ipakska+
!PV/ipana+
!PV/ipann+
!PV/ipapa+
!PV/ipiitsiiyóóhk+
!PV/ipiitsiy+
!PV/ipo't+
!PV/ipoina+
!PV/ipp+
!PV/ipp+
!PV/ippita+
!PV/ippoa+
!PV/ippssa'kapp+
!PV/ipsstsikatt+
!PV/ipsstsík+
!PV/ipákkssa+
!PV/isimi+
!PV/isinap+
!PV/isitsip+
!PV/isk+
!PV/iss+
!PV/isska'+
!PV/isstohkana+
!PV/ist+
!PV/ista'+
!PV/istohk+
!PV/istohkana+
!PV/istsa'+
!PV/istto't+
!PV/isttsikohpo+
!PV/isttsitsa+
!PV/isttssi+
!PV/it+
!PV/itap+
!PV/ito't+
!PV/iton+
!PV/itsisa+
!PV/itsst+
!PV/itáak+
!PV/iámoohk+
!PV/kaat+
!PV/kakanott+
!PV/kam+
!PV/kan+
!PV/kipita+
!PV/kipp+
!PV/kotski+
!PV/ksisttoyi+
!PV/káta'+
!PV/káák+
!PV/káátsisto+
!PV/kínnak+
!PV/maat+
!PV/matt+
!PV/mattsistá'+
!PV/mátt+
!PV/máttsit+
!PV/máát+
PV/máátaommita'p+
!PV/maak+
!PV/maam+
!PV/mak+
!PV/mato+
!PV/matsowá'p+
!PV/mi'kotsi+
!PV/miiksist+
!PV/miin+
!PV/miistap+
!PV/min+
!PV/missk+
!PV/misst+
!PV/mo'tóí+
!PV/máak+
!PV/máo'k+
!PV/na+
!PV/naat+
!PV/nai't+
!PV/niistsikáp+
!PV/niit+
!PV/niitsi+
!PV/niitsskimaan+
!PV/niitá'p+
!PV/noohk+
!PV/noohkátt+
!PV/níítaak+
!PV/o'kia'p+
!PV/o'kio+
!PV/o'tap+
!PV/ohk+
!PV/ohkan+
!PV/ohkana+
!PV/ohkit+
!PV/ohko+
!PV/ohkott+
!PV/ohpii+
!PV/ohpiistap+
!PV/ohpo'kii+
!PV/ohpok+
!PV/ohs+
!PV/oht+
!PV/ohtatsiwa+
!PV/oka'p+
!PV/oma+
!PV/omaa+
!PV/omahka+
!PV/omanista+
!PV/omat+
!PV/omi+
!PV/omiiksist+
!PV/omo'tap+
!PV/omohp+
!PV/omoht+
!PV/omoht+
!PV/omá+
!PV/on+
!PV/ona'+
!PV/onai't+
!PV/onaki+
!PV/oohk+
!PV/oohk+
!PV/oohkanistta+
!PV/oohkatt+
!PV/opaksikssto+
!PV/otam+
!PV/oto+
!PV/otomohk+
!PV/piin+
!PV/piitsiyoohk+
!PV/pin+
!PV/po'kí+
!PV/poina+
!PV/poohsap+
!PV/poína+
!PV/sa+
!PV/saa+
!PV/saaki+
!PV/saapo'kit+
!PV/saipa'+
!PV/saw+
!PV/sipi+
!PV/sok+
!PV/sook+
!PV/sootam+
!PV/sotám+
!PV/soyi+
!PV/ssap+
!PV/sska'+
!PV/sska'+
!PV/sspi+
!PV/sstahpik+
!PV/sstok+
!PV/sstonnat+
!PV/sstsina'+
!PV/sstónnat+
!PV/ssáak+
!PV/stam+
!PV/sáótat+
!PV/tatsiki+
!PV/waahki+
!PV/waahko+
!PV/waahto+
!PV/waahtsam+
!PV/waahtso+
!PV/waako'tsi+
!PV/waaksisto+
!PV/waanaoyit+
!PV/waanook+
!PV/waapiiwaan+
!PV/wayák+
!PV/wayákiit+
!PV/wáyák+
!PV/yaahs+
!PV/yiistap+
!PV/yoisstsikina+
!PV/yook+
!PV/yáak+
!PV/yámoohk+
!PV/á'p+
!PV/á+
!PV/á'+
!PV/áka+
!PV/ákstam+
!PV/ákáá+
!PV/ááhk+
!PV/ááhkamá'p+
!PV/ááhksikkama'p+
!PV/áák+
!PV/áísooka+
!PV/íka+
!PV/ípssit+

! Flag diacritics to be used
@U.person.NI@
@U.person.KI@
@U.person.OT@
@U.person.NULL@
@U.stem.PRE@
@U.stem.NON@
@U.stem.DEP@
@U.stem.SHORT@
@P.person.NI@
@P.person.KI@
@P.person.OT@
@P.person.NULL@
@R.person.NULL@
@R.person.OT@
@D.person.NULL@
@D.person.OT@
@P.im.IM@
@R.im.IM@
@D.im.IM@
@P.number.SG@
@P.number.PL@
@D.number.SG@
@D.number.PL@
@P.noun.PRE@
@P.noun.NON@
@R.noun.PRE@
@R.noun.NON@
! Verb flags
@R.accomp.A@
@R.person.NI@
@R.person.KI@
@R.person.KII@
@R.person.OT@
@R.person.YI@
@R.person.IMP@
@R.person.NULL@
@P.person.NI@
@P.person.KI@
@P.person.KII@
@P.person.OT@
@P.person.YI@
@P.person.IMP@
@P.person.NULL@
@R.mode.IND@
@R.mode.CON@
@R.mode.SUB@
@R.mode.IRR@
@R.mode.IMP@
@P.mode.IND@
@P.mode.CON@
@P.mode.SUB@
@P.mode.IRR@
@P.mode.IMP@
@D.person.NULL@
@D.person.OT@
@P.class.VAI@
@P.class.VII@
@P.class.VTI@
@P.class.VTA@
@R.class.VAI@
@R.class.VII@
@R.class.VTI@
@R.class.VTA@
@P.assoc.A@
@R.assoc.A@
@P.class.NOUN@
@P.class.VERB@
@R.class.NOUN@
@R.class.VERB@
@P.pos.NA@
@P.pos.NI@
@R.pos.NA@
@R.pos.NI@
@P.pos.NOUN@
@P.pos.VERB@
@R.pos.NOUN@
@R.pos.VERB@

! Constraining preverb recycling
@D.pvcount@
@P.pvcount.1@
@P.pvcount.2@
@P.pvcount.3@
@P.pvcount.4@
@P.pvcount.5@
@R.pvcount.1@
@R.pvcount.2@
@R.pvcount.3@
@R.pvcount.4@
@R.pvcount.5@
@D.pvcountf@
@P.pvcountf.1@
@P.pvcountf.2@
@P.pvcountf.3@
@R.pvcountf.1@
@R.pvcountf.2@
@R.pvcountf.3@
! Constraining preverb recycling
@D.pvcount@
@P.pvcount.1@
@P.pvcount.2@
@P.pvcount.3@
@P.pvcount.4@
@P.pvcount.5@
@P.pvcount.6@
@P.pvcount.7@
@P.pvcount.8@
@R.pvcount.1@
@R.pvcount.2@
@R.pvcount.3@
@R.pvcount.4@
@R.pvcount.5@
@R.pvcount.6@
@R.pvcount.7@
@D.pvcountf@
@P.pvcountf.1@
@P.pvcountf.2@
@P.pvcountf.3@
@P.pvcountf.4@
@R.pvcountf.1@
@R.pvcountf.2@
@R.pvcountf.3@
@D.pncount@
@P.pncount.1@
@P.pncount.2@
@P.pncount.3@
@R.pncount.1@
@R.pncount.2@
@R.pncount.3@
@D.encount@
@P.encount.1@
@P.encount.2@
@R.encount.1@
@R.encount.2@
@P.count1.P@
@P.count1.N@
@P.count1.T@
@P.count1.A@
@R.count1.P@
@R.count1.N@
@R.count1.T@
@R.count1.A@

! Special_characters
i2
i3
í2
í3
a2
a3
a4
o2
m2
n2
'
%^SP
%<
%>

!! Blackfoot Regular Verb Morphology

! Desired input-output
! Input: @U.person.NI@ 0
! Output: @U.person.NI@ nit 
! -> LEXC: @U.person.NI@0:@U.person.NI@ nit

LEXICON Root
@P.pos.VERB@@P.pos.VERB@ PREFIX_SETS ;
@P.pos.NA@@P.pos.NA@ NOUN_PREFIXES ;
@P.pos.NI@@P.pos.NI@ NOUN_PREFIXES ;

LEXICON NOUN_PREFIXES
@P.person.NI@:@P.person.NI@nit%< PREFIXES ;
@P.person.KI@:@P.person.KI@kit%< PREFIXES ;
@P.person.OT@:@P.person.OT@ot%< PREFIXES ;
@P.person.NULL@:@P.person.NULL@0 PREFIXES ;

LEXICON PREFIX_SETS
@P.class.VAI@	BASIC_PREFIXES ;
@P.class.VII@	BASIC_PREFIXES ;
@P.class.VTI@	BASIC_PREFIXES ;
@P.class.VTA@	BASIC_PREFIXES ;

LEXICON BASIC_PREFIXES
@P.mode.IND@	BASIC_IND_PREFIXES ;
@P.mode.CON@	BASIC_CNJ_PREFIXES ;
@P.mode.SUB@	BASIC_SBJ_PREFIXES ;
@P.mode.IRR@	BASIC_IRR_PREFIXES ;
@P.mode.IMP@	BASIC_IMP_PREFIXES ;

LEXICON BASIC_IND_PREFIXES
@P.person.NI@:@P.person.NI@nit%< PREFIXES ;
@P.person.KI@:@P.person.KI@kit%< PREFIXES ;
@P.person.OT@:@P.person.OT@ot%< PREFIXES ;
@P.person.NULL@:@P.person.NULL@0 PREFIXES ;

LEXICON BASIC_CNJ_PREFIXES
@P.person.NI@:@P.person.NI@nit%<    PREFIXES ;
@P.person.KI@:@P.person.KI@kit%<    PREFIXES ;
@P.person.OT@:@P.person.OT@ot%<     PREFIXES ;
@P.person.NULL@:@P.person.NULL@0    PREFIXES ;

LEXICON BASIC_SBJ_PREFIXES
@P.person.NULL@:@P.person.NULL@0	PREFIXES ;

LEXICON BASIC_IRR_PREFIXES
@P.person.NI@:@P.person.NI@nit%<    PREFIXES ;
@P.person.KI@:@P.person.KI@kit%<    PREFIXES ;
@P.person.NULL@:@P.person.NULL@0    PREFIXES ;

LEXICON BASIC_IMP_PREFIXES
@P.person.IMP@:@P.person.IMP@0    PREFIXES ;

LEXICON PREFIXES
@P.count1.N@@P.count1.T@@P.count1.A@@P.count1.P@@P.count1.N@@P.count1.T@@P.count1.A@@P.count1.P@0 PV_COUNTER1 ;
@R.mode.IND@@P.count1.N@Neg+:@R.mode.IND@@P.count1.N@%^SPi2máát BOUND1 ;
@R.mode.IMP@@P.count1.N@Neg+:@R.mode.IMP@@P.count1.N@%^SPi2miin BOUND1 ;
@R.mode.IMP@@P.count1.N@Neg+:@R.mode.IMP@@P.count1.N@%^SPi2piin BOUND1 ;
@R.mode.IND@@P.count1.N@PV/máátaommita'p+:@R.mode.IND@@P.count1.N@%^SPmáátaommita'p BOUND1 ;
@P.count1.P@PV/ikátá'+:@P.count1.P@i2kátá' BOUND1 ;
@P.count1.T@Imm+:@P.count1.T@ayáak BOUND1 ;
@P.count1.T@Dur+:@P.count1.T@á BOUND1 ;
@P.count1.T@Fut+:@P.count1.T@yáak BOUND1 ;
@P.count1.T@Past+:@P.count1.T@ii BOUND1 ;
@P.count1.A@Perf+:@P.count1.A@akáa BOUND1 ;
@P.count1.A@Perf+:@P.count1.A@ikáa BOUND1 ;
@P.count1.A@Perf+:@P.count1.A@okáa BOUND1 ; ! enumerating this one because it appears in these three forms

LEXICON BOUND1
0:%< PV_COUNTER1 ;

!! This counter ensures that each type of prenoun can only appear once in the following order: Negation | 0, Tense | 0, Aspect | 0, then ikata' | 0.

LEXICON PV_COUNTER1
@D.pvcountf@@R.count1.N@@P.pvcountf.1@@R.count1.N@ PREFIXES ;
@R.pvcountf.1@@R.count1.A@@P.pvcountf.2@@R.count1.A@ PREFIXES ;
@R.pvcountf.2@@R.count1.T@@P.pvcountf.3@@R.count1.T@ PREFIXES ;
@R.pvcountf.3@@R.count1.P@@P.pvcountf.4@@R.count1.P@ PREFIXES ;
0 PREVERBS2 ;


LEXICON PREVERBS
0 VERB_STEMS ;

LEXICON BOUND
0:%< PV_COUNTER ;

LEXICON PREVERBS2
PV/ááhkamá'p+:%^SPááhkamá'p BOUND ;
PV/aahksikkam+:%^SPaahksikkam BOUND ;
PV/aaksta'+:aaksta' BOUND ;
PV/ai'tamáak+:ai'tamáak BOUND ;
PV/akisspí+:akisspí BOUND ;
PV/akoksska+:akoksska BOUND ;
PV/ama+:ama BOUND ;
PV/anaw+:anaw BOUND ;
PV/ano+:anow BOUND ;
PV/anow+:anow BOUND ;
PV/apa'p+:apa'p BOUND ;
PV/assaak+:assaak BOUND ;
PV/awa'+:awa' BOUND ;
PV/i'sskaan+:i2'sskaan BOUND ;
PV/ihta+:ihtaw BOUND ;
PV/iiht+:iiht BOUND ;
PV/iihtsitssitak+:iihtsitssitak BOUND ;
PV/iikska'+:iikska' BOUND ;
PV/iimaa+:i3maa BOUND ;
PV/iimá+:iimá BOUND ;
PV/iina+:iina BOUND ;
PV/iinatt+:iinatt BOUND ;
PV/iinik+:iinik BOUND ;
PV/iitsiksist+:iitsiksist BOUND ;
PV/iiyik+:iiyik BOUND ;
PV/ika'to+:i2ka'to BOUND ;
PV/ikaiksist+:i2kaiksist BOUND ;
PV/ikamo't+:ikamo't BOUND ;
PV/ikayiss+:ikayiss BOUND ;
PV/ikihkiht+:ikihkiht BOUND ;
PV/ikimmat+:i2kimmat BOUND ;
PV/ikippa'+:i2kippa' BOUND ;
PV/ikkan+:ikkan BOUND ;
PV/ikkihkini+:ikkihkini BOUND ;
PV/iksissto+:i2ksissto BOUND ;
PV/iksksowa'+:iksksowa' BOUND ;
PV/ikstsina'+:ikstsina' BOUND ;
PV/ikíppoa+:ikíppoa BOUND ;
PV/imak+:imak BOUND ;
PV/inai't+:inai't BOUND ;
PV/innaahkoot+:innaahkoot BOUND ;
PV/ipahtsik+:i2pahtsik BOUND ;
PV/ipana+:ipana BOUND ;
PV/ipapa+:ipapa BOUND ;
PV/ipiitsiy+:%^SPi2piitsiy BOUND ;
PV/ipoina+:ipoina BOUND ;
PV/ipp+:ipp BOUND ;
PV/ippoa+:ippoa BOUND ;
PV/ipsstsikatt+:i2psstsikatt BOUND ;
PV/ipákkssa+:i2pákkssa BOUND ;
PV/isinap+:i2sinap BOUND ;
PV/isk+:isk BOUND ;
PV/isska'+:isska' BOUND ;
PV/ist+:ist BOUND ;
PV/istsa'+:i2stsa' BOUND ;
PV/isttssi+:i2sttssi BOUND ;
PV/iton+:iton BOUND ;
PV/iámoohk+:iámoohk BOUND ;
PV/kan+:hkan BOUND ;
PV/kotski+:i2kotski BOUND ;
PV/káátsisto+:káátsisto BOUND ;
PV/máttsit+:%^SPmáttsit BOUND ;
PV/mato+:mato BOUND ;
PV/miistap+:miistap BOUND ;
PV/mo'tóí+:mo'tóí BOUND ;
PV/naat+:%^SPnaat BOUND ;
PV/niitsi+:niitsi BOUND ;
PV/noohkátt+:%^SPnoohkátt BOUND ;
PV/o'kio+:o'kio BOUND ;
PV/ohkana+:ohkana BOUND ;
PV/ohpii+:ohpii BOUND ;
PV/ohpok+:ohpok BOUND ;
PV/oka'p+:oka'p BOUND ;
PV/omanista+:omanista BOUND ;
PV/omo'tap+:omo'tap BOUND ;
PV/omá+:omá BOUND ;
PV/onaki+:onaki BOUND ;
PV/oohkatt+:oohkatt BOUND ;
PV/otomohk+:otomohk BOUND ;
PV/po'kí+:po'kí BOUND ;
PV/sa+:saw BOUND ;
PV/saipa'+:saipa' BOUND ;
PV/sootam+:i2sootam BOUND ;
PV/sska'+:sska' BOUND ;
PV/sstok+:sstok BOUND ;
PV/ssáak+:i2ssáak BOUND ;
PV/waahki+:waahki BOUND ;
PV/waahtso+:waahtso BOUND ;
PV/waanook+:waanook BOUND ;
PV/wáyák+:wáyák BOUND ;
PV/yook+:yook BOUND ;
PV/áka+:áka BOUND ;
PV/ááhkamá'p+:ááhkamá'p BOUND ;
PV/íka+:íka BOUND ;
PN/aaká+:aaká	BOUND ;
PN/áápi+:áápi	BOUND ;
PN/aká+:aká	BOUND ;
PN/apak+:apak	BOUND ;
PN/ayaam+:ayaam	BOUND ;
PN/i'tsin+:i'tsin	BOUND ;
PN/iinohk+:iinohk	BOUND ;
PN/ikaw+:ikaw	BOUND ;
PN/iki'ta+:i2ki'ta	BOUND ;
PN/ikkak+:ikkak	BOUND ;
PN/iksi's+:iksi's	BOUND ;
PN/iksim+:iksim	BOUND ;
PN/iksisto+:i2ksisto	BOUND ;
PN/inap+:inap	BOUND ;
PN/inno+:i2nno	BOUND ;
PN/ipahp+:ipahp	BOUND ;
PN/ipahtsi+:i2pahtsi	BOUND ;
PN/ipisat+:ipisat	BOUND ;
PN/ippat+:ippat	BOUND ;
PN/isakoow+:isakoow	BOUND ;
PN/iss+:iss	BOUND ;
PN/isspik+:isspik	BOUND ;
PN/isttohk+:isttohk	BOUND ;
PN/itapiksst+:itapiksst	BOUND ;
PN/itsin+:itsin	BOUND ;
PN/kiihtsip+:kiihtsip	BOUND ;
PN/ksis+:ksis	BOUND ;
PN/máóhk+:máóhk	BOUND ;
PN/mattsi+:mattsi	BOUND ;
PN/míístap+:míístap	BOUND ;
PN/naam+:naam	BOUND ;
PN/naatsa+:naatsa	BOUND ;
PN/nimm+:nimm	BOUND ;
PN/o't+:o't	BOUND ;
PN/o'totam+:o'totam	BOUND ;
PN/ohkit+:ohkit	BOUND ;
PN/ohpo+:ohpo	BOUND ;
PN/ohsohkat+:ohsohkat	BOUND ;
PN/okaki+:okaki	BOUND ;
PN/omatap+:omatap	BOUND ;
PN/oohsi+:oohsi	BOUND ;
PN/opi+:opi	BOUND ;
PN/otats+:otats	BOUND ;
PN/ótssko+:ótssko	BOUND ;
PN/paahksíst+:paahksíst	BOUND ;
PN/pinááp+:pi2nááp	BOUND ;
PN/sa+:sa	BOUND ;
PN/saayippom+:saayippom	BOUND ;
PN/sainnis+:sainnis	BOUND ;
PN/sako+:sako	BOUND ;
PN/sata+:sata	BOUND ;
PN/sayippom+:sayippom	BOUND ;
PN/sikim+:i2sikim	BOUND ;
PN/sistsik+:i2sistsik	BOUND ;
PN/sohk+:sohk	BOUND ;
PN/sopow+:i2sopow	BOUND ;
PN/ssk+:ssk	BOUND ;
PN/sskonát+:i2sskonát	BOUND ;
PN/sspik+:sspik	BOUND ;
PN/wa'kot+:wa'kot	BOUND ;
PN/waaist+:waaist	BOUND ;
PN/waamohs+:waamohs	BOUND ;
PN/waaniit+:waaniit	BOUND ;
PN/waapo'k+:waapo'k	BOUND ;
PN/waawow+:waawow	BOUND ;
PN/yááhs+:yááhs	BOUND ;
PN/yaam+:yaam	BOUND ;
PN/yoohk+:yoohk	BOUND ;
